Alaska, session 34, SB211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 11 * Section 1. AS 08.03.010(c)(3) is amended to read: 12 (3) State Board of Registration for Architects, Engineers, and Land Surveyors 01 (AS 08.48.011) - June 30, 2033 [2025]; 02 * Sec 2. AS 08.03.010(c)(6) is amended to read: 03 (6) Board of Professional Counselors (AS 08.29.010) - June 30, 2032 04 [2026]; 05 * Sec. 2. AS 08.03.010(c)(11) is amended to read: 06 (11) Board of Marital and Family Therapy (AS 08.63.010) - June 30, 07 2034 [2026]; 08 * Sec. 3. AS 08.03.010(c)(18) is amended to read: 09 (18) Board of Psychologist and Psychological Associate Examiners 10 (AS 08.86.010) - June 30, 2031 [2026]; 11 * Sec. 4. AS 08.03.010(c)(19) is amended to read: 12 (19) Real Estate Commission (AS 08.88.011) - June 30, 2030 [2026]; 13 * Sec. 5. AS 08.03.010(c)(20) is amended to read: 14 (20) Board of Certified Real Estate Appraisers (AS 08.87.010) - 15 June 30, 2032 [2026]; 16 * Sec. 6. AS 08.03.010(c)(21) is amended to read: 17 (21) Board of Social Work Examiners (AS 08.95.010) - June 30, 2034 18 [2026]; 19 * Sec. 7. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 20 read: 21 LEGISLATIVE AUDIT: REPORTS. By the first day of the First Regular Session of 22 the Thirty-Sixth Alaska State Legislature, the legislative audit division established under 23 AS 24.20.241 shall submit reports to the legislative budget and audit committee established 24 under AS 24.20.151 concerning compliance by the Board of Psychologist and Psychological 25 Associate Examiners and the Board of Certified Real Estate Appraisers with the 26 recommendations of the April 17, 2025, and June 5, 2025, audits of the boards conducted 27 under AS 44.66. 28 * Sec. 8. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 29 read: 30 EXEMPTION FROM AS 44.66.050(e). This Act is exempt from the provision of 31 AS 44.66.050(e) that prohibits a bill from continuing or reestablishing more than one board or 01 commission. 02 * Sec. 9. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 03 read: 04 RETROACTIVITY. This Act is retroactive to June 30, 2026. 05 * Sec. 10. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.